Illinois, session 104th, SB1160.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-699.21 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.21)7    Sec. 3-699.21. United Nations Protection Force license 8plates.9    (a) In addition to any other special license plate, the 10Secretary, upon receipt of all applicable fees and 11applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary of 12State, may issue United Nations Protection Force license 13plates to residents of this State who served in the United 14Nations Protection Force in Yugoslavia, Somalia, Panama, or 15Grenada. The special United Nations Protection Force plate 16issued under this Section shall be affixed only to passenger 17vehicles of the first division, motorcycles, autocycles, and 18motor vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 198,000 pounds. Plates issued under this Section shall expire 20according to the staggered multi-year procedure established by 21Section 3-414.1 of this Code.22    (b) The design, color, and format of the plates shall be 23wholly within the discretion of the Secretary of State. The   SB1160 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05499 LNS 15528 b1Secretary may, in his or her discretion, allow the plates to be 2issued as vanity plates or personalized in accordance with 3Section 3-405.1 of this Code. The plates are not required to 4designate "Land of Lincoln", as prescribed in subsection (b) 5of Section 3-412 of this Code. The Secretary shall approve and 6prescribe stickers or decals as provided under Section 3-412.7    (c) An applicant shall be charged a $15 fee for original 8issuance in addition to the applicable registration fee. This 9additional fee shall be deposited into the Secretary of State 10Special License Plate Fund. For each registration renewal 11period, a $2 fee, in addition to the appropriate registration 12fee, shall be charged and shall be deposited into the 13Secretary of State Special License Plate Fund.14(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-843, eff. 1-1-25.)